Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 10. Permit to Carry a Concealed Handgun.

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.700.
Permit to carry a concealed handgun.

The department shall issue a permit to carry a concealed handgun to a person who

applies in person at an office of the Alaska State Troopers;

qualifies under AS

18.65.705

;

submits on an application form approved by the department the information required under AS

18.65.705

and

18.65.710

; the department shall post on the department’s website the state laws and regulations relating to concealed handguns, which must include a concise summary of where, when, and by whom a handgun can be carried under state and federal law and shall, on request, mail a copy of the regulations and summary to an applicant or permittee;

submits one complete set of fingerprints in the format approved by the department that is of sufficient quality so that the fingerprints may be processed; the fingerprints must be taken by a person, group, or agency approved by the department; the department shall maintain a list of persons, groups, or agencies approved to take fingerprints and shall provide the list to the public upon request; the fingerprints shall be used to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

;

submits evidence of successful completion of a handgun course as provided in AS

18.65.715

;

provides one frontal view color photograph of the person taken within the preceding 30 days that includes the head and shoulders of the person and is of a size specified by the department;

shows a valid Alaska driver’s license or identification card at the time of application;

does not suffer a physical infirmity that prevents the safe handling of a handgun; and

pays the application fee required by AS

18.65.720

.

The department shall either approve or reject an application for a permit to carry a concealed handgun under (a) of this section within 30 days of receipt of the application. If the department has not received necessary fingerprint eligibility information from another agency by the end of this 30-day period, and the applicant is otherwise eligible, the department shall issue a conditional permit to the applicant subject to immediate revocation under the procedure provided in AS

18.65.740(a)

— (c) if the fingerprint information subsequently discloses that the applicant is ineligible for a permit. The department shall notify the applicant in writing of the reason for a rejection.

A person whose application is rejected under this section may appeal the rejection decision to the commissioner. A person may seek judicial review of the decision of the commissioner under AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

.

A permit issued under (a) of this section expires on the person’s birthday in the fifth year following issuance of the permit. The department may adjust the length of an initial permit so that a permit is not issued for a period of more than five years.

The department shall issue a permit to carry a concealed handgun to an honorably retired peace officer of this state who applies for a concealed handgun permit within one year of the officer’s retirement and who satisfies the requirements of this subsection. To qualify for a permit under this subsection, an honorably retired peace officer must satisfy (a)(1) — (3) and (6) — (9) of this section and, unless the honorably retired peace officer has qualified with a handgun within five years of the officer’s retirement, must also satisfy (a)(5) of this section. The department may not require an honorably retired peace officer applying under this subsection to comply with (a)(4) of this section to receive a permit. The department shall issue the permit without submitting information to or receiving permit eligibility information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The department may adopt regulations to define an “honorably retired peace officer” and the evidence that must be submitted to establish eligibility under this subsection.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 1 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 4 ch 94 SLA 2000; am § 14 ch 79 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 2, ch. 50, SLA 2009, the 2009 amendment of subsection (d) of this section applies “to permits issued and renewed after October 7, 2009.”

Sec. 18.65.705.
Qualifications to obtain a permit.

A person is qualified to receive and hold a permit to carry a concealed handgun if the person

is 21 years of age or older;

is eligible to own or possess a handgun under the laws of this state and under federal law;

is a resident of the state and has been for the 90 days immediately preceding the application for a permit;

has not been convicted of two or more class A misdemeanors of this state or similar laws of another jurisdiction within the six years immediately preceding the application;

is not now in and has not in the three years immediately preceding the application been ordered by a court to complete an alcohol or substance abuse treatment program; and

has successfully completed a handgun course as provided in AS

18.65.715

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 51 SLA 1995; am § 30 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 1 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 94 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.710.
Application for permit to carry a concealed handgun.

The application for a permit to carry a concealed handgun must contain the following information:

the applicant’s name, physical residence, mailing address, place and date of birth, physical description, including height, weight, race, hair color, and eye color, Alaska driver’s license or identification card number, and the city and state of each place the applicant has resided in the five years immediately preceding the application;

a statement that the applicant qualifies under AS

18.65.705

;

a statement that the applicant has been furnished with a copy of the state laws and regulations relating to concealed handguns, has read those sections, and understands them;

a statement that the applicant desires a permit to carry a concealed handgun for a lawful purpose, which may include self-defense;

a statement by the applicant that all statements, answers, and attachments to the application are true and complete;

a conspicuous warning that an applicant who supplies a false statement, answer, or document in connection with the application that the applicant does not believe to be true may be prosecuted for unsworn falsification in the second degree and, if found guilty, may be punished for violation of a class A misdemeanor, and that, in such cases, the permit shall be revoked and the applicant may be barred from any further application for a permit; and

a statement that the applicant understands that a permit eligibility investigation will be conducted as a part of the application process, that this may involve computerized records searches, and that the applicant authorizes the investigation.

An application under (a) of this section may not inquire of an applicant about, or require the submission of, information beyond that described in that subsection. As part of an application under (a) of this section, the department may not inquire of an applicant as to any firearms owned by the applicant.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 13 ch 1 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 94 SLA 2000; am § 16 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For the crime of unsworn falsification in the second degree, see AS

11.56.210

.

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.715.
Demonstration of competence with handguns.

An applicant for a permit to carry a concealed handgun shall provide a certificate of successful completion of a handgun course that is approved by the department. The handgun course must have been completed within the 12 months immediately preceding the application. The department shall approve a handgun course, including the personal protection course offered by the National Rifle Association, if the course tests the applicant’s

knowledge of Alaska law relating to firearms and the use of deadly force;

familiarity with the basic concepts of the safe and responsible use of handguns;

knowledge of self-defense principles; and

physical competence with a handgun.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 1 SLA 1998.]

The department may not require a certificate of competence submitted under this section to contain any specifically identifying information, including make, model, or serial number, of a handgun with which an applicant or permittee has demonstrated competence.

The department shall maintain a list of approved courses and shall provide the list to the public upon request.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 20 ch 1 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 94 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.720.
Fees.

The department shall charge a nonrefundable fee for the processing of the application for and initial issuance of a permit, renewal of a permit, or replacement of a permit. The fees shall be set by regulation and must be based on the actual costs incurred by the department. However, the fee for the processing of an application and initial issuance of a permit may not exceed $99 and the fee for renewal of a permit or replacement of a permit may not exceed $30.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 14 ch 1 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.725.
Permit renewal.

A permittee shall apply for renewal of a permit to carry a concealed handgun within 90 days before the expiration of the permit, on a renewal form approved by the department. The renewal form must include

any change in the information originally submitted under AS

18.65.710

;

a statement that the person remains qualified to receive and hold a permit to carry a concealed handgun under AS

18.65.705

;

one frontal view photograph of the person taken within the preceding 30 days that includes the head and shoulders of the person and is of a size specified by the department;

the renewal fee required under AS

18.65.720

; and

the warning listed in AS

18.65.710

(a)(6).

[Repealed, § 15 ch 94 SLA 2000.]

A renewal of a permit to carry a concealed handgun submitted on or after the expiration date is subject to a late fee of $25. The department may not accept a renewal for a permit that is submitted more than 60 days after the expiration date of the permit. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the holder of an expired permit from applying for a new permit.

A renewal form under (a) of this section may not inquire of a permittee about, or require the submission of, information beyond that described in (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding AS

18.65.705

(3), a permittee does not become ineligible to hold a permit, and need not return or surrender a permit, when ceasing to be a resident of the state, and the department may not require a permittee to return or surrender a permit because a permittee ceases to be a resident of the state. However, a permittee may not renew a permit if the permittee is not a resident of the state at the time of renewal.

The department shall mail the permittee a notice of expiration by first class mail at least 90 days before expiration of the permit.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 20 ch 1 SLA 1998; am §§ 8, 9, 15 ch 94 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 3 ch 24 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.730.
Replacement of permit.

The department may replace a permit that the permittee certifies under oath has been lost, stolen, or destroyed, provided the permittee applies in person and

provides one frontal view photograph of the permittee taken within the preceding 30 days that includes the head and shoulders and is of a size specified by the department;

pays the replacement fee required under AS

18.65.720

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 10 ch 94 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.735.
Suspension of permit.

The department shall immediately suspend a permit to carry a concealed handgun if a permittee becomes ineligible to hold a permit under AS

18.65.705

.

A person whose permit is suspended under this section shall immediately surrender the permit to the nearest peace officer. A peace officer receiving a permit under this section shall immediately forward the permit to the department.

The department shall retain a permit suspended under this section until the permit is revoked or returned to the permittee.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 31 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 1 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.740.
Revocation of permit; appeal.

A permit to carry a concealed handgun shall be immediately revoked by the department when the permittee

becomes disqualified to receive and hold a permit under AS

18.65.705

;

is convicted of two class A misdemeanors of this state or similar laws of another jurisdiction within a six-year period if at least one of the convictions occurs after the application;

knowingly supplied a false or fraudulent answer, statement, or document, or made a material misstatement or omission, in connection with an application for a permit or renewal or replacement of a permit.

A person whose permit is revoked under (a) of this section shall immediately surrender the permit to the nearest peace officer. A peace officer receiving a permit under this section shall immediately forward the permit to the department.

A person whose permit is revoked under this section may appeal the revocation decision to the commissioner. A person may seek judicial review of the decision of the commissioner under AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

.

A person whose permit is revoked may not apply for a permit until at least five years after the revocation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 16 ch 1 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.745.
No liability for issuance of permit or for training.

The state, and its officers and employees, are not liable by virtue of having issued a permit to carry a concealed handgun for damage or harm caused by the permittee.

A person who provides firearm training to a person who receives a permit under AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

is not liable for damage or harm caused by the permittee.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994)

Sec. 18.65.748.
Permit holders from other jurisdictions considered Alaska permit holders.

A person holding a valid permit to carry a concealed handgun from another state or a political subdivision of another state is a permittee under AS

18.65.700(b)

for purposes of AS

18.65.755

—

18.65.765

.

History.

(§ 17 ch 1 SLA 1998; am § 12 ch 94 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 62 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.750.
Possession and display of permit. [Repealed, § 7 ch 62 SLA 2003.]

Sec. 18.65.755.
Places where permittee may not possess a concealed handgun.

A permittee may not possess a concealed handgun

[Repealed, § 7 ch 62 SLA 2003.]

anywhere a person is prohibited from possessing a handgun under state or federal law.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 1 SLA 1998.]

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am §§ 18, 20 ch 1 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 62 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For prohibition on possessing a loaded firearm in a place where alcohol is sold for consumption, see AS

11.61.220(a)(2)

; for prohibition on possession of a firearm when impaired by an intoxicating liquor or controlled substance, see AS

11.61.210(a)(1)

.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

Sec. 18.65.760.
Misuse of a permit.

The holder of a permit issued under AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

may not

alter the permit;

allow another person to use the permit;

possess or display a suspended or revoked permit; or

represent or display an expired permit as if the permit were valid, unless the holder has submitted a complete, timely renewal form under AS

18.65.725

and the renewal process has been delayed due to circumstances not under the control of the applicant; this paragraph does not require a holder to return or surrender a permit upon its expiration, nor may the department require a holder to return or surrender a permit upon its expiration.

A person who violates (a)(1) — (3) of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person who violates (a)(4) of this section is guilty of a violation and upon conviction may be punished by a fine of not more than $100.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 13 ch 94 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 18.65.765.
Responsibilities of the permittee.

The holder of a permit issued under AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

shall notify the department of a change in the permittee’s address within 30 days;

shall immediately report a lost, stolen, or illegible permit to the department;

shall immediately notify the department if the holder is no longer qualified to hold a permit under AS

18.65.705

.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation and upon conviction may be punished by a fine of not more than $100.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 15 ch 94 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.770.
Permits, applications, and other materials not public records.

Applications, permits, and renewals are not public records under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

and may only be used for law enforcement purposes.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 6 ch 62 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125.

Sec. 18.65.775.
Regulations; reciprocity agreements.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

. This section does not delegate to the department the authority to regulate or restrict the issuing of permits beyond those provisions contained in AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

.

The department shall enter into reciprocity agreements with other states that have the legal authority to enter into such agreements so that permittees may carry concealed handguns in those other states.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For concealed handgun permits, see 13 AAC 30.

Sec. 18.65.778.
Municipal preemption.

A municipality may not restrict the carrying of a concealed handgun by permit under AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 14 ch 94 SLA 2000)

Sec. 18.65.780.
Prohibition of possession of concealed handguns. [Repealed, § 15 ch 94 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 18.65.785.
Procedure for local option elections. [Repealed, § 15 ch 94 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 18.65.790.
Definitions.

In AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety;

“competence” means the ability to place in a life size silhouette target

seven out of 10 shots at seven yards;

six out of 10 shots at 15 yards;

“concealed handgun” means a firearm, that is a pistol or a revolver, and that is covered or enclosed in any manner so that an observer cannot determine that it is a handgun without removing it from that which covers or encloses it or without opening, lifting, or removing that which covers or encloses it; however, “concealed handgun” does not include a shotgun, rifle, or a prohibited weapon as defined under AS

11.61.200

;

“department” means the Department of Public Safety;

“permit” means a permit to carry a concealed handgun issued under AS

18.65.700

—

18.65.790

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 19 ch 1 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 94 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (5) was formerly (7). Renumbered in 2002 to reflect the 2000 repeal of former paragraphs (5) and (6).